Mississippi statutes. Title 21. Municipalities
Reciprocal Law Enforcement Assistance Between Municipalities During Civil Emergencies

§ 21-21-31.
Declaration of legislative findings.

The legislature finds that the availability of law enforcement officers to a municipality in a state of civil emergency is of a statewide concern, and that it is in the public interest that municipalities needing additional law enforcement officers in a state of civil emergency be able to procure such additional law enforcement officers through reciprocal assistance from other municipalities.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-231; Laws, 1971, ch 345, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1971.

§ 21-21-33.
Definitions.

“Municipality” as used in Sections 21-21-31 through 21-21-41 means any city, town, or village as defined in Section 21-1-1. “Law enforcement officer” as used herein means any policeman.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-232; Laws, 1971, ch. 345, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1971.

§ 21-21-35.
Powers of municipality to provide assistance.

Any municipality shall have the power by resolution or order of its governing body to make provision for or to authorize its mayor or chief administrative officer or chief of police to make provision for its regularly employed law enforcement officers to assist any other municipality, when in the opinion of the mayor or other officer authorized to declare a state of civil emergency in such other municipality, there exists in such other municipality a need for the services of additional law enforcement officers to protect the health, life and property of such other municipality, its inhabitants, and the visitors thereto, by reason of riot, unlawful assembly characterized by the use of force and violence, or threat thereof by three (3) or more persons acting together or without lawful authority, or during time of natural disaster or man-made calamity.

Any municipality shall have the power to send law enforcement officers of its municipality on loan to assist other municipalities in the state in undercover work or as a special agent to combat crime. The chief administrative officer or chief of police of a municipality shall have the power to assist other chief administrative officers or chiefs of police upon a written or oral request from such municipalities; provided, however, that an oral request must be followed by a written authorization. In addition, any municipality may loan any law enforcement officer to any other law enforcement agency of the state or of any political subdivision of the state for drug enforcement purposes, the expense of the officer to be paid by the agency to which the officer is assigned.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-233; Laws, 1971, ch. 345, § 3; Laws, 1979, ch. 358; Laws, 1998, ch. 494, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 26, 1998).

§ 21-21-37.
Powers of law enforcement officer while in another municipality.

While any law enforcement officer regularly employed as such in one municipality is in the service of another municipality pursuant to Sections 21-21-31 through 21-21-41, he shall be a peace officer of such other municipality and be under the command of the law enforcement officer therein who is in charge in that municipality, with all the powers of a regular law enforcement officer in such other municipality, as fully as though he were within the municipality where regularly employed and his qualification, respectively, for office where regularly employed shall constitute his qualification for office in such other municipality, and no other oath, bond, or compensation need be made.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-234; Laws, 1971, ch. 345, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1971.

§ 21-21-39.
Rights of law enforcement officer while in another municipality.

Any law enforcement officer who is ordered by the official designated by the governing body of any municipality to perform police or peace duties outside the territorial limits of the municipality where he is regularly employed as such officer, shall be entitled to the same wage, salary, pension, and all other compensation and all other rights for such service, including injury or death benefits, as though the service had been rendered within the limits of the municipality where he is regularly employed. He shall also be paid for any reasonable expenses of travel, food, or lodging that he may incur while on duty outside such limits.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-235; Laws, 1971, ch. 345, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1971.

§ 21-21-41.
Payments to law enforcement officer; reimbursement to the regularly employing municipality.

All wage and disability payments, pension payments, damage to equipment and clothing, medical expense, and expenses of travel, food, and lodging shall be paid by the municipality regularly employing such law enforcement officer. Upon making such payments, the municipality that furnished the services shall, when it so requests, be reimbursed by the municipality whose authorized official requested the services out of which the payments arose. Each such municipality is hereby expressly authorized to make such payments and reimbursements notwithstanding any provision in its charter or ordinances to the contrary.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-236; Laws, 1971, ch 345, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1971.